ladina.dic
absolvō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:absolvere
absorbeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:absorbēre
absorptum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:absorbēre
abstinēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:abstinēre
abstentum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:abstinēre
abstinuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:abstinēre
accēdō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:accēdere
accingō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:accingere
accurrō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:accurrere
addō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:addere
agō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:agere
capiō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:capere
colō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:colere
currō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:currere
debēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:debēre
debuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:debēre
discō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:discere
doctum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:docēre
docēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:docēre
docuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:docēre
dolitūrus/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:dolēre
dolēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:dolēre
doluī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:dolēre
emō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:emere
fleō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:flēre
flēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:flēre
flētum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:flēre
flēvī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:flēre
fugiō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:fugere
habēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:habēre
habitum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:habēre
habuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:habēre
impleō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:implēre
implēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:implēre
implētum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:implēre
implēvī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:implēre
iussī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:iubēre
iussum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:iubēre
iubēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:iubēre
lateō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 st:latēre
latuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 st:latēre
latēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:latēre
legō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:legere
manēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:manēre
mānsī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:manēre
mānsum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:manēre
nīteō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:nītēre
nītēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:nītēre
plangō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:planctere
rapiō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:rapere
respondēre/1,1032,10320 st:respondēre
respondī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 st:respondēre
rideō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:ridēre
ridēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:ridēre
rīsum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:ridēre
rīsī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:ridēre
salvēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:salvēre
salvēre/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:salvēre
sedeō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:sedēre
sedēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:sedēre
sessum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:sedēre
sēdī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:sedēre
studēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:studēre
studuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:studēre
taceō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:tacēre
tacēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:tacēre
tacitum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:tacēre
tacuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:tacēre
timēre/1,1032,10320 po:verb st:timēre
timuī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:timēre
videō/1,1002,10021,10022,10023,10024,10025,10026,10027 po:verb st:vidēre
vīsum/1,1022,10221 po:verb st:vidēre
vīdī/1,1012,10121,10122,10123,10124 po:verb st:vidēre
vincō/1,1003,10031,10032,10033,10034,10035,10036,10037 po:verb st:vincere
